District of Columbia statutes.
8-151.15

Applicability.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the provisions of this chapter shall not be implemented until appropriated funds are available to pay the cost of implementation.

History

Feb. 15, 2006, D.C. Law 16-51, § 115, 52 DCR 10812